Massachusetts, session 194th, H738.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 2 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in chapter 296 of the Acts of 
2018, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:-  
“(e) All public high schools shall provide a civics test for all of their students prior to 
graduation. Beginning in the 2021-2022 school year, in order to graduate from high school or 
obtain a general equivalency diploma, a pupil must correctly answer at least 60 of the 100 
questions listed on a civics test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used 
by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. A pupil who does not obtain a 
passing score on the test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test may retake 
the test until the pupil obtains a passing score. Pupils who receive special education shall not be 
required to achieve passing scores on the civics test in order to graduate from high school. 

of 2 11  (f) The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish rules and 
regulations for monitoring adherence subsection (e).